Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.050

Amendment, repeal to include code numbers—Assignment of code numbers.

The legislature in amending or repealing laws shall include in such act references to the code numbers of the law affected. The reviser shall assign code numbers to such permanent and general laws as are hereafter enacted at any legislative session.

[ 1959 c 95 s 5; 1955 c 5 s 3; 1951 c 157 s 17. Prior: (i) 1941 c 149 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 152-39. (ii) 1947 c 282 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 152-40.]